apertium-sme-fin.fin.lexc
LEXICON VerbStem/Conditional
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][PRS=PL1]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@i{AV+}simme	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][PRS=PL2]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@i{AV+}sitte	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][PRS=PL3]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@i{AV+}siv{aä}t	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][PRS=SG1]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@i{AV+}sin	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][PRS=SG2]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@i{AV+}sit	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][PRS=SG3]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@i{AV+}si	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[MOOD=COND][NEG=CON]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@i{AV+}si	Clitic/Optional		;

LEXICON VerbStem/Passive
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=COND][PRS=PE4]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@{AV-}t{aä}isiin	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=COND][PRS=PE4][NEG=CON]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@{AV-}t{aä}isi	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=PE4][NEG=CON]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@{AV-}t{aä}k{oö}	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=PE4]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@{AV-}t{aä}k{oö}{oö}n	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=PSS][INF=E][CASE=INE]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@{AV-}t{aä}ess{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=PSS][INF=E][CASE=INS]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@{AV-}t{aä}en	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=PSS][INF=MA][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@{AV-}t{aä}m{aä}n	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PE4]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@{AV-}t{aä}neen	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PE4][NEG=CON]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@{AV-}t{aä}ne	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][PRS=PE4]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@{AV-}tiin	Clitic/Optional		;
@U.NEED.NOMINAL@[VOICE=PSS][PCP=VA]:@U.NEED.NOMINAL@{AV-}t{aä}v	kotus_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller		;

LEXICON VerbStem/Past
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][PRS=PL1]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@im{AV-}me	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][PRS=PL2]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@it{AV-}te	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][PRS=PL3]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@i{AV+}v{aä}t	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][PRS=SG1]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@in{AV-}	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][PRS=SG2]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@it{AV-}	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][PRS=SG3]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@i{AV+}	Clitic/Optional		;

LEXICON VerbStem/Potential
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL1]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@{AV+}{nlrs}emme	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL2]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@{AV+}{nlrs}ette	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL3]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@{AV+}{nlrs}ev{aä}t	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG1]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@{AV+}{nlrs}en	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG2]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@{AV+}{nlrs}et	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG3]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@{AV+}{nlrs}ee	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[MOOD=POTN][NEG=CON]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@{AV+}{nlrs}e	Clitic/Optional		;
@U.NEED.NOMINAL@[VOICE=ACT][PCP=NUT]:@U.NEED.NOMINAL@{AV+}{nlrs}	kotus_47_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller		;

LEXICON VerbStem/ParticiplePassive
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRES][PRS=PE4]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@{aä}{aä}n{AV-}{F}{AV-}	Clitic/Optional		;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRES][PRS=PE4][NEG=CON]:@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@{aä}{AV-}	Clitic/Optional		;

LEXICON VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple
@U.NEED.NOMINAL@[VOICE=PSS][PCP=NUT]:@U.NEED.NOMINAL@{AV-}{t~~}{uy}	kotus_1_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller		;

LEXICON VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/C
@U.NEED.NOMINAL@[VOICE=PSS][PCP=NUT]:@U.NEED.NOMINAL@{AV-}{t~~}{uy}{C}	kotus_1_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller		;

LEXICON VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/F
@U.NEED.NOMINAL@[VOICE=PSS][PCP=NUT]:@U.NEED.NOMINAL@{AV-}{t~~}{uy}{F}	kotus_1_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller		;

LEXICON VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/I
@U.NEED.NOMINAL@[VOICE=PSS][PCP=NUT]:@U.NEED.NOMINAL@{AV-}{t~~}{uy}{I}	kotus_1_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller		;



LEXICON kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller
	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
	VerbStem/Present	;
	VerbStem/Past	;
	VerbStem/Potential	;
	VerbStem/Imperative	;
	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:t	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:t	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:t	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/C	;

LEXICON kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller
0:{aä}	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:{aä}	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:{aä}	VerbStem/Present	;
	VerbStem/Past	;
0:{aä}	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:{aä}	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:{aä}	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:et	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:et	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:et	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/C	;

LEXICON kotus_54F_VERB/stemfiller
0:{t~~}{aä}{F}	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{F}	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{F}	VerbStem/Present	;
0:s	VerbStem/Past	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{F}	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{F}	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{F}	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:{t~~}et{F}	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:{t~~}et{F}	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:{t~~}et{F}	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/C	;

LEXICON kotus_54I_VERB/stemfiller
0:{t~~}{aä}{I}	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{I}	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{I}	VerbStem/Present	;
0:s	VerbStem/Past	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{I}	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{I}	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{I}	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:{t~~}et{I}	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:{t~~}et{I}	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:{t~~}et{I}	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/C	;

LEXICON kotus_54J_VERB/stemfiller
0:{t~~}{aä}{J}	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{J}	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{J}	VerbStem/Present	;
0:s	VerbStem/Past	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{J}	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{J}	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{J}	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:{t~~}et{J}	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:{t~~}et{J}	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:{t~~}et{J}	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/C	;

LEXICON kotus_54K_VERB/stemfiller
0:{t~~}{aä}{K}	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{K}	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{K}	VerbStem/Present	;
0:s	VerbStem/Past	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{K}	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{K}	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{K}	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:{t~~}et{K}	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:{t~~}et{K}	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:{t~~}et{K}	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/C	;

LEXICON kotus_55F_VERB/stemfiller
0:{t~~}{aä}{F}	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{F}	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{F}	VerbStem/Present	;
0:s	VerbStem/Past	;
0:{t~~}{F}	VerbStem/Past	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{F}	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{F}	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{F}	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:{t~~}et{F}	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:{t~~}et{F}	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:{t~~}et{F}	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/C	;

LEXICON kotus_55I_VERB/stemfiller
0:{t~~}{aä}{I}	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{I}	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{I}	VerbStem/Present	;
0:s	VerbStem/Past	;
0:{t~~}{I}	VerbStem/Past	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{I}	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{I}	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{I}	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:{t~~}et{I}	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:{t~~}et{I}	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:{t~~}et{I}	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/C	;

LEXICON kotus_55J_VERB/stemfiller
0:{t~~}{aä}{J}	VerbStem/AInfinitive	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{J}	VerbStem/EInfinitive	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{J}	VerbStem/Present	;
0:s	VerbStem/Past	;
0:{t~~}{J}	VerbStem/Past	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{J}	VerbStem/Potential	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{J}	VerbStem/Imperative	;
0:{t~~}{aä}{J}	VerbStem/Conditional	;
0:{t~~}et{J}	VerbStem/ParticiplePassive	;
0:{t~~}et{J}	VerbStem/Passive	;
0:{t~~}et{J}	VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/C	;

LEXICON kotus_52_VERB/stub
asua'][POS=VERB][KTN=52]:asu{^back}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
hyväksyä'][POS=VERB][KTN=52]:hyväksy{^front}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
kastua'][POS=VERB][KTN=52]:kastu{^back}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
kiehua'][POS=VERB][KTN=52]:kiehu{^back}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
kulua'][POS=VERB][KTN=52]:kulu{^back}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
kuulua'][POS=VERB][KTN=52]:kuulu{^back}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
kypsyä'][POS=VERB][KTN=52]:kypsy{^front}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
lausua'][POS=VERB][KTN=52]:lausu{^back}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
osallistua'][POS=VERB][KTN=52]:osallistu{^back}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
riehua'][POS=VERB][KTN=52]:riehu{^back}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
riisua'][POS=VERB][KTN=52]:riisu{^back}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
seisoa'][POS=VERB][KTN=52]:seiso{^back}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
valvoa'][POS=VERB][KTN=52]:valvo{^back}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
kukkua'][POS=VERB][KTN=52][KAV=A]:kuk{k~~}u{^back}{A}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
loppua'][POS=VERB][KTN=52][KAV=B]:lop{p~~}u{^back}{B}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
suuttua'][POS=VERB][KTN=52][KAV=C]:suut{t~~}u{^back}{C}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
aikoa'][POS=VERB][KTN=52][KAV=D]:ai{k~~}o{^back}{D}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
leipoa'][POS=VERB][KTN=52][KAV=E]:lei{p~~}o{^back}{E}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
ilahtua'][POS=VERB][KTN=52][KAV=F]:ilah{t~~}u{^back}{F}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
kutoa'][POS=VERB][KTN=52][KAV=F]:ku{t~~}o{^back}{F}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
peseytyä'][POS=VERB][KTN=52][KAV=F]:pesey{t~~}y{^front}{F}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
sitoa'][POS=VERB][KTN=52][KAV=F]:si{t~~}o{^back}{F}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
yhtyä'][POS=VERB][KTN=52][KAV=F]:yh{t~~}y{^front}{F}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
kokoontua'][POS=VERB][KTN=52][KAV=J]:kokoon{t~~}u{^back}{J}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
parantua'][POS=VERB][KTN=52][KAV=J]:paran{t~~}u{^back}{J}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
tyhjentyä'][POS=VERB][KTN=52][KAV=J]:tyhjen{t~~}y{^front}{J}	kotus_52_VERB/stemfiller	;
LEXICON kotus_53_VERB/stub
elää'][POS=VERB][KTN=53]:el{^front}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
innostaa'][POS=VERB][KTN=53]:innost{^back}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
kaksinkertaistaa'][POS=VERB][KTN=53]:kaksinkertaist{^back}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
koristaa'][POS=VERB][KTN=53]:korist{^back}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
muistaa'][POS=VERB][KTN=53]:muist{^back}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
rakastaa'][POS=VERB][KTN=53]:rakast{^back}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
vahvistaa'][POS=VERB][KTN=53]:vahvist{^back}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
aiheuttaa'][POS=VERB][KTN=53][KAV=C]:aiheut{t~~}{^back}{C}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
elättää'][POS=VERB][KTN=53][KAV=C]:elät{t~~}{^front}{C}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
heittää'][POS=VERB][KTN=53][KAV=C]:heit{t~~}{^front}{C}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
ilmoittaa'][POS=VERB][KTN=53][KAV=C]:ilmoit{t~~}{^back}{C}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
keittää'][POS=VERB][KTN=53][KAV=C]:keit{t~~}{^front}{C}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
korjauttaa'][POS=VERB][KTN=53][KAV=C]:korjaut{t~~}{^back}{C}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
menettää'][POS=VERB][KTN=53][KAV=C]:menet{t~~}{^front}{C}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
odottaa'][POS=VERB][KTN=53][KAV=C]:odot{t~~}{^back}{C}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
pelottaa'][POS=VERB][KTN=53][KAV=C]:pelot{t~~}{^back}{C}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
pyhittää'][POS=VERB][KTN=53][KAV=C]:pyhit{t~~}{^front}{C}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
sammuttaa'][POS=VERB][KTN=53][KAV=C]:sammut{t~~}{^back}{C}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
sovittaa'][POS=VERB][KTN=53][KAV=C]:sovit{t~~}{^back}{C}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
säilyttää'][POS=VERB][KTN=53][KAV=C]:säilyt{t~~}{^front}{C}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
tiedottaa'][POS=VERB][KTN=53][KAV=C]:tiedot{t~~}{^back}{C}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
viettää'][POS=VERB][KTN=53][KAV=C]:viet{t~~}{^front}{C}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
yrittää'][POS=VERB][KTN=53][KAV=C]:yrit{t~~}{^front}{C}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
johtaa'][POS=VERB][KTN=53][KAV=F]:joh{t~~}{^back}{F}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
pöllähtää'][POS=VERB][KTN=53][KAV=F]:pölläh{t~~}{^front}{F}	kotus_53_VERB/stemfiller	;
